District of Columbia statutes.
42-2018

Joint and several liability of purchaser and seller of unit for amounts owing under § 42-2016; purchaser’s right of indemnity; right to statement of amount of unpaid assessments.

The purchaser of a condominium unit in a voluntary sale shall be jointly and severally liable with the seller for the amounts owing by the latter under § 42-2016 upon his interest in the condominium unit up to the time of conveyance; without prejudice to the purchaser’s right to recover from the other party the amounts paid by him as such joint debtor; provided, that any such purchaser, or a lender under a deed of trust, mortgage, or encumbrance, or parties designated by them, shall be entitled to a statement from the manager, board of directors, or of administration, as the case may be, setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments against the seller or borrower, and the unit conveyed or encumbered shall not be subject to a lien for any unpaid assessment in excess of the amount set forth.

History

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 457, Pub. L. 88-218, § 18

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-2019.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1718.
1973 Ed., § 5-918.

Editor's Notes

Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.